src/zir.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund ^GV1 ^GV2 ^GV3
LEXICON Root

acontecer Verb2;
agradecer Verb2;
amanecer Verb2;
enochecer Verb2;
aparecer Verb2;
apetecer Verb2;
carecer Verb2;
compadecer Verb2;
comparecer Verb2;
embellecer Verb2;
enflaquecer Verb2;
ennoblecer Verb2;
enriquecer Verb2;
envejecer Verb2;
establecer Verb2;
fallecer Verb2;
favorecer Verb2;
florecer Verb2;
fortalecer Verb2;
humedecer Verb2;
obedecer Verb2;
ofrecer Verb2;
oscurecer Verb2;
padecer Verb2;
parecer Verb2;
permanecer Verb2;
pertenecer Verb2;
rejuvenecer Verb2;
restablecer Verb2;
conocer Verb2;
nacer Verb2;
traducir Verb2;
merecer Verb2;

LEXICON Verb2
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
